Utah statutes.
30-1-6.   Who may solemnize marriages -- Certificate.

(1)  Marriages may be solemnized by the following persons only:

(a)  ministers, rabbis, or priests of any religious denomination who are:

(i)  in regular communion with any religious society; and

(ii)  18 years of age or older;

(b)  Native American spiritual advisors;

(c)  the governor;

(d)  the lieutenant governor;

(e)  mayors of municipalities or county executives;

(f)  a justice, judge, or commissioner of a court of record;

(g)  a judge of a court not of record of the state;

(h)  judges or magistrates of the United States;

(i)  the county clerk of any county in the state, if the clerk chooses to solemnize marriages;

(j)  the president of the Senate;

(k)  the speaker of the House of Representatives; or

(l)  a judge or magistrate who holds office in Utah when retired, under rules set by the Supreme Court.

(2)  A person authorized under Subsection (1) who solemnizes a marriage shall give to the couple married a certificate of marriage that shows the:

(a)  name of the county from which the license is issued; and

(b)  date of the license's issuance.

(3)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Judge or magistrate of the United States" means:

(i)  a justice of the United States Supreme Court;

(ii)  a judge of a court of appeals;

(iii)  a judge of a district court;

(iv)  a judge of any court created by an act of Congress the judges of which are entitled to hold office during good behavior;

(v)  a judge of a bankruptcy court;

(vi)  a judge of a tax court; or

(vii)  a United States magistrate.

(b) (i)  "Native American spiritual advisor" means a person who:

(A) (I)  leads, instructs, or facilitates a Native American religious ceremony or service; or

(II)  provides religious counseling; and

(B)  is recognized as a spiritual advisor by a federally recognized Native American tribe.

(ii)  "Native American spiritual advisor" includes a sweat lodge leader, medicine person, traditional religious practitioner, or holy man or woman.

(4)  Notwithstanding any other provision in law, no person authorized under Subsection (1) to solemnize a marriage may delegate or deputize another person to perform the function of solemnizing a marriage, except that only employees of the office responsible for the issuance of marriage licenses may be deputized.

